Utah statutes.
4-37-112.   Screens.

(1)  Each aquaculture and fee fishing facility shall be equipped with screening or another device to prevent the movement of fish into or out of the facility.

(2)  The department may conduct site inspections to assure compliance with Subsection (1).

